Illinois, session 104th, HB1656.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $$5,000,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Rebuild Illinois 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Equal Opportunity for 7the William Leonard Public Library. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.